Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BUREAU OF CRIMINAL APPREHENSION; INDEPENDENT USE OF FORCE INVESTIGATIONS UNIT; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $550,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to increase funding for the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension's Independent Use of Force Investigations Unit, created under Minnesota Statutes, section 299C.80. The commissioner must use the money to hire two additional special agents and one additional criminal intelligence analyst to work solely on cases assigned to the Independent Use of Force Investigations Unit. This appropriation is in addition to the money appropriated for this purpose in Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, section 3, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end